Connecticut, session 2026, SB00136.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Department of Education shall
2 conduct a study of public education in Connecticut. Not later than May
3 26, 2026, the department shall submit a report of the results of such
4 study to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
5 cognizance of matters relating to education, in accordance with the
6 provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
ED Joint Favorable
SB136 / File No. 16 1

SB136 File No. 16
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill has no fiscal impact. It requires the State Department of
Education (SDE) to conduct a study regarding public education in the
state and it is anticipated SDE can complete the requirements with
existing resources.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB136 / File No. 16 2

SB136 File No. 16
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 136
AN ACT CONCERNING PUBLIC EDUCATION IN THE STATE.